Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-4,105
Bait dealer's permit; issuance; fees.

It shall be unlawful for individuals, either resident or nonresident, to sell baitfish or amphibians except according to rules and regulations established by the commission. The commission may require a bait dealer's permit for a fee of not more than thirty-seven dollars for residents and not more than two hundred thirty dollars for nonresidents, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327.

If such permits are required by the commission, the application shall include the social security number of the applicant.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 215;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 25;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 16;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 16.